test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h23_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: egg
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: egg
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: eggi
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: egs
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: egg
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: egg
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: [eggum, eggjum]
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: eggja
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: eggið
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: eggið
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: egginum
    egg+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: egsins
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: eggini
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: eggini
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: [eggunum, eggjunum]
    egg+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: eggjanna
